Wisconsin, session 2025, AB886.
do enact as follows:AB886,13Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 4insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB886,26Section 2. 20.435 (5) (eh) of the statutes is created to read:AB886,2,9720.435 (5) (eh) Children’s mental health treatment grants pilot program. As a 8continuing appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for children’s mental health 9treatment grants under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section (3) (1) (b).AB886,310Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB886,2,1111(1) Children’s mental health treatment grants pilot program.AB886,2,1312(a) A city, village, town, county, or nonprofit organization may apply to the 13department of health services for a grant under par. (b).AB886,2,1714(b) From the appropriation under s. 20.435 (5) (eh), the department of health 15services shall award grants, in an amount not to exceed $50,000 per grant, to 16applicants to increase access for children to research-based mental health 17treatments that are alternatives to medication or talk therapy.AB886,2,1918(c) The department of health services may not award a grant under par. (b) 19after 2 years after the effective date of this paragraph.AB886,2,2020